Hawaii statutes.
§23G-13 Publishing of session laws. As
soon as possible after the close of each session of the legislature, the
revisor of statutes shall prepare for publication all laws duly enacted at such
session, arranged in the order of their becoming law, together with a suitable
index and tables showing what general statutes have been affected by the
session laws. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 8, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next